Massachusetts, session 194th, S1785.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 32 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 94C. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary
affecting the non-contributory or contributory system, any condition of impairment of health
caused by Post Traumatic Stress Disorder resulting in total or partial disability or death to an
employee of a correctional facility, shall, if he successfully passed a physical examination on
entry into such service, or subsequently successfully passed a physical examination, which
examination failed to reveal any evidence of such condition, be presumed to have been suffered
in the line of duty, unless the contrary be shown by competent evidence.
of 1